parSem/xip/archive/simple.1/esperanto/GRAMMARS/FRENCH/FST/src/BasicBuild.xfst
# ============================================================================
# TYPE:		(x)fst script
# CONTENT:      remove flag diacritics from French Analyser
# 
# LANGUAGE:     FRENCH
#
# AUTHOR:       J.P.Chanod, A.Schiller
#
# CREATED:      11-Jul-2003 (JPC)
# UPADTED:	31-Jan-2006 (AS)
#
# ============================================================================
# USAGE:        xfst 	-s [LEX.fst] -s [Filter.fst] -s [Map.fst] 
#			-l [ThisFile]
# ============================================================================

# load ../aux/Clit.fst
# define clitix

# load ../aux/Map.fst
define map

# load ../aux/FilterLex.fst
define filter 

# load ../aux/FrenchSmall+Syn.fst 
define fre

clear stack

# -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
# extract clitics from morphological analyser
# specials for clitics (-il -m'en) which may appear at the end of a verb

define clitix  $[%+PC] .o. fre ;

define clitpuncs  clitix .o. $[%'| %- | %/ | %.];

# makes sure begins with  hyphen: removes l'on, m', s' ... from the list
define clitpuncs clitpuncs .o. [%- ?*];

# add forms like -t-il  't-il t-il
define clitpuncs  clitpuncs | ([0:%- | 0:%']) [0:t] [$[%+Nom ?* %+P3] .o. clitpuncs] ;

# add the HYPH feature
define clitpuncs [%+HYPH %+PC <- %+PC] .o. clitpuncs ;


# all clitics 
define clitix [clitix .o. [?* - clitpuncs.2]] | clitpuncs ;

# modify nous/vous as PC (separate InvCase between Nom and Dat/Acc (NNom
read regex  [
	[%+Nom | %+NNom] <- %+InvCase || _  ?* [%+P1 | %+P2] %+PC 
.o. 	clitix 
];
define clitix

# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------
read regex
[ a | à | â | b | c | ç | d | e | é | è | ê | ë | f | g | h | i | î |
ï | j | k | l | m | n | ñ | o | ô | ö | p | q | r | s | t | u | ù | û | ü | 
v | w | x | y | z ] ;

define lower ;

read regex
[ A | À | Â | B | C | Ç | D | E | É | È | Ê | Ë | F | G | H | I | Î |
Ï | J | K | L | M | N | Ñ | O | Ô | Ö | P | Q | R | S | T | U | Ù | Û | Ü | 
V | W | X | Y | Z ] ;

define upper ;

read regex
[
[a:A]  |  [à:À]  |  [â:Â]  |  [à:A]  |  [â:A ]  | 
[b:B]  |  [c:C]  |  [ç:Ç]  |  [ç:C]  |  [d:D]  |  
[e:E]  |  [ê:Ê]  |  [è:È]  |  [ é:É]  |  [ë:Ë]  |  
[ê:E]  |  [è:E]  |  [ é:E]  |  [ë:E]  | 
[f:F]  |  [g:G]  |  [h:H]  |  
[i:I]  |  [ î:Î]  |  [ï:Ï]  |  [î:I]  |  [ï:I]  | 
[j:J]  |  [k:K]  |  [l:L]  |  [m:M]  |  [n:N]  |  [ñ:N]  |  [ñ:Ñ]  |  
[o:O]  |  [ ô:Ô]  |  [ô:O]  | 
[p:P]  |  [q:Q]  |  [r:R]  |  [s:S]  |  [t:T]  |  [u:U]  |  
[v:V]  |  [ w:W]  |  [x:X]  |  [y:Y]  |  [z:Z]
] ;

define low2up ;

read regex
[
[A:a]  |  [À:à]  |  [Â:â]  |  [A:à]  |  [A:â ]  | 
[B:b]  |  [C:c]  |  [Ç:ç]  |  [C:ç]  |  [D:d]  |  
[E:e]  |  [Ê:ê]  |  [È:è]  |  [ É:é]  |  [Ë:ë]  |  
[E:ê]  |  [E:è]  |  [ E:é]  |  [E:ë]  | 
[F:f]  |  [G:g]  |  [H:h]  |  
[I:i]  |  [ Î:î]  |  [Ï:ï]  |  [I:î]  |  [I:ï]  | 
[J:j]  |  [K:k]  |  [L:l]  |  [M:m]  |  [N:n]  |  [N:ñ]  |  [Ñ:ñ]  |  
[O:o]  |  [ Ô:ô]  |  [O:ô]  | 
[P:p]  |  [Q:q]  |  [R:r]  |  [S:s]  |  [T:t]  |  [U:u]  |  
[V:v]  |  [ W:w]  |  [X:x]  |  [Y:y]  |  [Z:z]
] ;

define up2low ;

#### the following used to capitalise initial letters (including initial in any part of MWE)
###define low2up [? | low2up1 ] [~$[% ] | [% ]   [? | low2up1 ] ]* ;

# and the following takes care of all cap as well
###define low2up low2up | [~$[lower] | low2up1]* ; 

define num [ %0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ] ;

define ops [  %, | %. |  %> | %< |  %* | %( | %) | %- | %+ | %/ | %= | %% ] ;



##############################
echo >>> define measures
read regex
[
  (U S %  ) %$  %+InvGen:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0 | 
  %% %+InvGen:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Noun %+NOUN%_INV:0  |
  [ ([k|M|G]) [[m|W|t r| h] (%.) ((%/) [h|m n | s | m | k m]) |  H z | F | F F | E C U | W h ] |
    [k|M|G] [o|b|B] |
     k g | c c | c m | m m
 ] (2) %+InvGen:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Measure:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0 
];
define measure
clear stack

# remove measures for basic dictionnary
define fre fre .o. [?* - measure.2];
clear stack


#removes prefixes and suffixes (clitics)
define fre   ~$[%< | %> | %+PC ] .o. fre ;


echo >>> apply filter
define fre filter .o. fre ;


# excludes numerical expressions with digits: 100 000 or 100+3 or +Percent
define fre ~$[num ?* [%+Card | %+Numeral | %+Percent]] .o. fre ;

# exclude dates and hours
define fre ~$[%+Date | %+Heure]  .o. fre ;

#removes "de l''" and "de la"  from the list (should be split as de + le)
define fre fre .o. ~[ d  e [% ] l [%' | a]] ;


# modify some entries

# modify "car" as SConj
define fre [[c a r %+SConj ] <- c a r %+Coord] .o. fre ;


# introduce boite as a Noun (a common mispell
regex 	fre .o. [
          [b o î t e -> b o [i | î] t e] |   
          [ o e -> [Ó |  o e]]
         ]
 ;
define fre




# adds forms such as au(x) futur(es) actionnaire(s)  chante(nt), chantai(en)t
define adj $[%+Adj | %+PaPrt | %+PrPrt]  .o. fre ;

define adjfem  $%+Fem .o. adj ;
define adjpl $%+PL .o. adj ;

# additional forms for adjectives: futur(es)  future(s) futur(e) futur(s)
define adjfem1 adjfem .o. [ e s -> [  %( e s %)] || _ .#.] ;
define adjfem2 adjfem .o. [ e  -> [ %( e  %)] || _ .#.] ;
define adjpl1 adjpl .o. [ s -> [  %( s %)] || _ .#.] ;

#additional forms for verbs:  chien(s), chapeau(x)
define nounpl $[%+PL] .o. [$[%+Noun]  .o. fre] ;
define nounpl1 nounpl .o. [ s -> [  %( s %)] || _ .#.] ;
define nounpl2 nounpl .o. [ x -> [  %( x %)] || _ .#.] ;

#additional forms for verbs: chante(nt), chantai(en)t
define verbpl $%+P3 .o. [$[%+PL] .o. [$[%+Verb]  .o. fre]] ;
define verbpl1 verbpl .o. [ e n t -> [ %( e n %) t | e %( n t %)  ] || _ .#.] ;

#additional forms for dets and preps de(s) and au(x)t
define misc $%+PL .o. [$[%+Det | %+Prep]  .o. fre] ;
define misc1 misc .o. [ s -> [  %( s %)] || _ .#.] ;
define misc1 misc1 | [misc .o. [ x -> [  %( x %)] || _ .#.]] ;

define fre  fre |  adjfem1 | adjfem2 | adjpl1 | nounpl1 | nounpl2 | verbpl1 | misc1;



# Contracted determiner
define fre [ %+Prep <-  %+Det ||  %+Prep %= l e ?* %+Def _] .o. fre ; 		 
#
## Contracted relative pronoun
define fre [  %+Dat <-  %+InvCase || à %+Prep %= l e q u e l _  ] .o. fre ; 		 
define fre [  %+Gen <-  %+InvCase || d e %+Prep %= l e q u e l _  ] .o. fre ; 		 

################################################################################################
# Map tags to HMM tagset       
################################################################################################
echo >>> apply map
regex map .o. fre ;
define fre ;

################################################################################################
# add some sub-lexicons (e.g. clitic pronouns like t-il )
################################################################################################
echo >>> add sub-lexicons
read regex	[ fre | clitix | measure ];
